Hawaii statutes.
[§321-6.5] Clinical
laboratory test results. (a) Clinical laboratory test results may
be provided to authorized persons for any purpose permitted under the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and federal
regulations promulgated thereunder.

(b) For purposes of this section,
"authorized persons" shall include:

(1) The provider ordering the test, or the provider's
designee; and

(2) Any covered entity as defined under 45 Code of
Federal Regulations section 160.103 promulgated under the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191. [L 2010, c 72, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next